Wisconsin, session 2025, SB523.
do enact as follows:SB523,13Section 1. 7.52 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB523,2,1847.52 (3) (a) The board of absentee ballot canvassers shall first open the carrier 5envelope only, and, in such a manner that a member of the public, if he or she 6desired, could hear, announce the name of the absent elector or the identification 7serial number of the absent elector if the elector has a confidential listing under s. 16.47 (2). When the board of absentee ballot canvassers finds that the certification 2has been properly executed and the applicant is a qualified elector of the ward or 3election district, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall enter an indication on 4the poll list next to the applicant’s name indicating an absentee ballot is cast by the 5elector. The board of absentee ballot canvassers shall then open the envelope 6containing the ballot in a manner so as not to deface or destroy the certification 7thereon. The board of absentee ballot canvassers shall take out the ballot without 8unfolding it or permitting it to be unfolded or examined. Unless the ballot is cast 9under s. 6.95, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall verify that the ballot has 10been endorsed by the issuing clerk. If the poll list indicates that proof of residence 11is required and no proof of residence is enclosed or the name or address on the 12document that is provided is not the same as the name and address shown on the 13poll list, the board of absentee ballot canvassers shall proceed as provided under s. 146.97 (2). The board of absentee ballot canvassers shall mark the poll list number of 15each elector who casts an absentee ballot on the back of the elector’s ballot. The 16board of absentee ballot canvassers shall then deposit the ballot into the proper 17ballot box and enter the absent elector’s name or poll list number after his or her 18name on the poll list.SB523,2,1919